Utah statutes.
54-19-102.   Definitions.

As used in this section:

(1)  "Internet protocol-enabled service" means any service, functionality, or application that uses Internet protocol or a successor protocol that enables an end-user to send or receive voice, data, or video communications.

(2)  "Voice over Internet protocol service" means any service that:

(a)  enables real time, two-way voice communication originating from or terminating at the user's location in Internet protocol or a successor protocol;

(b)  uses a broadband connection from the user's location; and

(c)  permits a user to receive a telephone call that originates on the public switched telephone network and to terminate a call to the public switched telephone network.

